Washington statutes.
RCW 36.13.030

County census authorized—Personnel—How conducted.

For the purpose of making a county census, the legislative authority of any county may employ one or more suitable persons. The census shall be conducted in accordance with standard census definitions and procedures as specified by the office of financial management.

[ 1979 c 151 s 37; 1977 ex.s. c 110 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.13.030. Prior: 1923 c 177 s 2; RRS s 4200-7.]

NOTES:

Population determinations, office of financial management: Chapter 43.62 RCW.